Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 7. Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission.

§ 30-56.
Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission; composition; terms; compensation and expenses; office space; quorum; voting on recommendations.

There is hereby created the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission in the legislative branch of state government. The Commission shall consist of nine members of the House of Delegates appointed by the Speaker thereof, of whom at least five shall be members of the House Committee on Appropriations, and five members from the Senate appointed by the Rules Committee of the Senate, of whom at least two shall be members of the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, and the Auditor of Public Accounts, who shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member. Members shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Members may be reappointed for successive terms.

Members of the Commission shall receive such compensation as provided in § 30-19.12 and shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties on the Commission. Funding for the costs of compensation and expenses of the members shall be provided from existing appropriations to the Commission. Adequate office space shall be provided by the Commonwealth.

The Commission shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among its membership. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum. Meetings of the Commission shall be held upon the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request.

No recommendation of the Commission shall be adopted if a majority of the Senate members or a majority of the House members appointed to the Commission (i) vote against the recommendation and (ii) vote for the recommendation to fail notwithstanding the majority vote of the Commission.

History.

1973, c. 452; 1979, c. 316; 1988, c. 172; 2004, c. 1000.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000 divided the former paragraph into the first two paragraphs; in the first paragraph, inserted “in the legislative branch of state government,” substituted “House Committee . . . ex officio member” for “House Appropriations Committee, and five members from the Senate appointed by the Privileges and Elections Committee of the Senate, of whom at least two shall be members of the Finance Committee, and the Auditor of Public Accounts, ex officio, who shall have no vote,” and added the last two sentences; in the second paragraph, substituted “shall receive . . . on the Commission” for “shall receive compensation as provided in § 30-19.12 and their necessary expenses incident to their work upon the Commission” and added the second sentence; and added the third and fourth paragraphs.

§ 30-57.
Director, executive staff and personnel.

The Commission shall appoint, subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the General Assembly, a Director and fix his duties and compensation. The Director may with prior approval of the Commission employ and fix the duties and compensation of an adequate executive staff as may be requisite to make the studies and research and budget analyses required by this chapter. The Director and the executive staff shall be appointed for a term of six years and shall consist of professional persons having experience and training in legislative budgetary procedures, management analyses and cost accounting. The Director and any executive staff member may be removed from office for cause by a majority vote of the Commission. Such other professional personnel, consultants and secretarial and clerical employees may be engaged upon such terms and conditions as set forth by the Commission.

History.

1973, c. 452.

§ 30-58.
Repealed by Acts 1975, c. 324.

Cross references.

For present section covering the subject matter of the repealed section, see § 30-58.1.

§ 30-58.1.
Powers and duties of Commission.

The Commission shall have the following powers and duties:

Make performance reviews of operations of state agencies to ascertain that sums appropriated have been, or are being expended for the purposes for which such appropriations were made and to evaluate the effectiveness of programs in accomplishing legislative intent;

Study on a continuing basis the operations, practices and duties of state agencies, as they relate to efficiency in the utilization of space, personnel, equipment and facilities;

Make such special studies and reports of the operations and functions of state agencies as it deems appropriate and as may be requested by the General Assembly;

Assess, analyze, and evaluate the social and economic costs and benefits of any proposed mandated health insurance benefit or mandated provider that is not included in the essential health benefits required by federal law to be provided under a health care plan, including the mandate’s predicted effect on health care coverage premiums and related costs, net costs or savings to the health care system, and other relevant issues, and report its findings with respect to the proposed mandate to the Health Insurance Reform Commission; and

Make such reports on its findings and recommendations at such time and in such manner as the Commission deems proper submitting same to the agencies concerned, to the Governor and to the General Assembly. Such reports as are submitted shall relate to the following matters:

Ways in which the agencies may operate more economically and efficiently;

Ways in which agencies can provide better services to the Commonwealth and to the people; and

Areas in which functions of state agencies are duplicative, overlapping, or failing to accomplish legislative objectives or for any other reason should be redefined or redistributed.

History.

1975, c. 324; 2006, c. 413; 2013, c. 709.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 413 inserted subsection D and redesignated former subsection D as subsection E.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 709, redesignated former subsections A to E as subdivisions 1 to 5, and redesignated former subdivisions E 1 to E 3 as subdivisions 5 a to 5 c; and in subdivision 4, inserted “that is not included in the essential health benefits required by federal law to be provided under a health care plan,” deleted “but not limited to” following “including,” and substituted “Health Insurance Reform Commission” for “Special Advisory Commission on Mandated Health Insurance Benefits.”

§ 30-58.2.
Supplementary studies and reports.

The Commission shall prepare supplementary studies and reports of the program reviews and evaluations called for in §§ 30-58.1 and 30-67 in the following manner:

At least once in each biennium and at such other times as the Commission deems necessary, a report shall be made to the General Assembly which includes: (i) annotations of reports previously issued; (ii) a summary of significant actions taken by executive agencies in response to reports and recommendations previously issued; and (iii) matters pertaining to the report topics that may require additional legislative attention and consideration.

From time to time, agencies involved in matters which have been studied under the provisions of § 30-58.1 or § 30-67 may be required to communicate to the Commission at a hearing called for such purpose or in writing, the status of actions completed or being taken in response to reports and recommendations previously issued.

In the event a report of the Commission cites waste, extravagance, unauthorized activities, or other significant deficiencies which result in the misuse of public funds, a supplementary report shall be made at such time as the Commission deems appropriate, which provides the General Assembly: (i) a review of the problem; (ii) recommendations made by the Commission or other legislative committee to correct the problem; (iii) actions taken or planned by the agency to correct the problem; and (iv) such other matters as may require additional legislative attention to correct the problem.

Supplementary reports published by the Commission shall be issued to the Governor, agencies concerned, and members of the General Assembly.

History.

1980, c. 239.

§ 30-58.3.
Annual report on state spending.

No later than November 15 of each year, the Commission shall provide to the Governor and the General Assembly an annual report on state spending to be published as a state document that shall include, among other things, (i) an identification and analysis of spending functions and programs that could be consolidated with other programs without diminishing the quality of the services provided to the citizens of the Commonwealth; (ii) an identification and analysis of those spending functions or programs which no longer have a distinct and discernible mission or are not performing their missions efficiently; (iii) an identification and analysis of the state programs that have had the largest impact on the growth of state spending over the prior five biennia, in dollar terms; (iv) an identification and analysis of the programs growing the fastest in percentage terms; (v) for the programs identified as the largest or fastest-growing, comparisons of the growth in spending on those programs to the rate of increase in inflation and the growth in populations served by those programs over a comparable time period; (vi) an analysis of the causes for the growth in spending on the largest and fastest-growing programs and whether the growth in spending appears rationally related to the rates of increase in inflation, tax relief measures, mandated expenditures, populations served, or any other related matter; and (vii) such other related issues as it deems appropriate.

All agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to the Commission in the preparation of this report, upon request.

History.

2001, c. 304; 2004, c. 1000.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000 inserted “to be published as a state document” in subsection A.

§ 30-58.4.
Pilot program for analysis of state agency budget submissions.

The Commission shall develop a pilot program to analyze and evaluate estimates submitted by state agencies and provided to the chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations pursuant to §

2.2-1504

to ascertain that sums requested are appropriated based on the missions, operations, practices, and duties of such agencies. Such pilot program shall include, but not be limited to, (i) an assessment of the procedures for executive budget submission oversight in other states, (ii) development of procedures that could be adopted in Virginia for state agency budget submission analysis, and (iii) preliminary analysis and evaluation of the budget submission of one state agency, to be selected jointly by the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations and the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission, in accordance with such procedures. Technical assistance shall be provided to the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission by the Department of Planning and Budget. All agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to the Commission in conducting the pilot program, upon request.

The Commission shall submit to the Division of Legislative Automated Systems an executive summary and report of its progress in meeting the directives of this statute no later than the first day of the 2009 Regular Session of the General Assembly. The executive summary and report shall be submitted for publication as a report document as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.

History.

2007, c. 803.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the House Committee on Appropriations” for “the House Appropriations Committee,” and “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance” and for “Senate Finance Committee.” March 10, 2021.

§ 30-59.
State agencies to furnish information and assistance.

All agencies of the Commonwealth, their staff and employees shall provide the Commission with necessary information for the performance of its duties, and to afford the Commission’s staff ample opportunity to observe agency operations.

History.

1973, c. 452.

§ 30-59.1.
State agency defined.

For the purposes of §§ 30-58.1 and 30-59, the terms “state agency,” “state agencies,” “agency,” and “agencies” shall mean all executive, judicial, and legislative entities of the Commonwealth as well as all constitutionally or statutorily created state entities.

History.

1979, c. 731.

§ 30-60.
Auditor of Public Accounts to render assistance upon request; his relationship to Commission.

The Commission may request and receive the assistance of the staff of the Auditor of Public Accounts in making desired special studies and fiscal reviews within the manpower limitations of his office. The Commission may serve as an advisory and contact agency for the Auditor of Public Accounts to make such special reports as he may be required by law to submit to the General Assembly.

History.

1973, c. 452.

§ 30-61.
Advisory committees.

The Commission may associate with itself such advisory committees of businessmen and others as it may deem necessary to advise it with respect to what business practices can be adopted to achieve greater economies and more efficient service. The expenses of the members of such committees shall be paid from the funds of the Commission.

History.

1973, c. 452.

§ 30-61.1.
Operational and programmatic efficiency and effectiveness reviews.

In addition to the review and evaluation of state entities pursuant to the Legislative Program Review and Evaluation Act (§ 30-65 et seq.), the Commission may establish an operational and programmatic efficiency and effectiveness review and assessment of any state departments, agencies, and programs. The Commission may contract with a United States-based private management consulting firm to conduct the efficiency and effectiveness review and assessment. Such contract shall be pursuant to a fixed price contract and shall not provide for any payment resulting from the implementation of any recommendations of the review.

The purpose of the review and assessment shall be to provide an objective and independent cost-savings assessment of the Commonwealth’s organizational structure and its programs in order to provide information to the Governor and the General Assembly to effect savings in expenditures, a reduction in duplication of effort, and programmatic efficiencies in the operation of state government. Any review and assessment conducted pursuant to this section shall take into consideration the results of any prior studies, audits, or reviews conducted by the Commission, the General Assembly or the Auditor of Public Accounts, any Governor-appointed commission or like entity, or any other independent entity that addressed the structure and operation of state government and identified monetary savings or efficiencies leading to a reduction in costs or reduced duplication of effort.

The Commission shall submit a report to the General Assembly on the results of any review and assessment by December 1 of the year in which such review is conducted.

History.

2017, c. 726.

§ 30-62.
Repealed by Acts 1979, c. 731.

§ 30-63.
Payment of expenses of Commission.

The salaries, per diems and other expenses necessary to the functions of the Commission shall be payable from funds appropriated to the Commission.

History.

1973, c. 452.